Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2279
Community service; length.

The length of a community service sentence shall be as follows:

(1) Pursuant to section 29-2206, 29-2208, or 29-2412, for an infraction, not less than four nor more than twenty hours;

(2) For a violation of a city ordinance that is an infraction and not pursuant to section 29-2206, 29-2208, or 29-2412, not less than four hours;

(3) For a Class IV or Class V misdemeanor, not less than four nor more than eighty hours;

(4) For a Class III or Class IIIA misdemeanor, not less than eight nor more than one hundred fifty hours;

(5) For a Class I or Class II misdemeanor, not less than twenty nor more than four hundred hours;

(6) For a Class IIIA or Class IV felony, not less than two hundred nor more than three thousand hours; and

(7) For a Class III felony, not less than four hundred nor more than six thousand hours.

Laws 1986, LB 528, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 364, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB259, § 9.